Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.100

Sanctions applied to noncomplying districts.

The superintendent of public instruction is hereby authorized and directed to establish appropriate sanctions to be applied to any school district of the state failing to comply with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.060 and 28A.155.080 through 28A.155.160 to be applied beginning upon the effective date thereof, which sanctions shall include withholding of any portion of state aid to such district until such time as compliance is assured.

[ 2007 c 115 s 12; 1990 c 33 s 128; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.13.080.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.